Vermont, session 2025-2026, H695.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendments to the charter of the Town
of Bennington as set forth in this act. The voters approved the proposal of
amendment on March 4, 2025.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 103 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 103. TOWN OF BENNINGTON
* * *
VT LEG #383309 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.695
2026 Page 2 of 2
§ 511. LOCAL OPTION TAX
(a) If the Select Board by a majority vote recommends, the voters of the
Town may, at an annual or special meeting warned for the purpose, by a
majority vote of those present and voting, assess any or all of the following:
* * *
(3) a one-percent alcoholic beverages tax; or
(4) a one-percent sales tax; or
(5) a one-percent tax on non-owner-occupied short-term rentals.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #383309 v.1